fst/irverb.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
+V
! Person
+1p
+2p
+3p

! Gender
+Masc
+Fem

!Number
+Sg
+Pl

+CausI		! Causative (study+CausI -> teach x)
+CausII		! Extended causative (studt+CausII -> make x learn 

! Tense
+Pres
+Fut
+Past

! Aspect
+Hab		! Habitual
+Prog		! Progressive
+Perf		! Perfective

! Mood
+Imp		! Imperative
+Sub		! Subjunctive

! Relation
+Int		! Intimate
+Fam		! Familiar
+Pol		! Polite

LEXICON Irregular
हो+V:0 Hona;

हो+V+Perf:हु Perfective;
जा+V+Perf:ग Perfective;
कर+V+Perf:कि Perfective;
दे+V+Perf:दि Perfective;
ले+V+Perf:लि Perfective;

दे+V+Imp+Fam:दो #;
ले+V+Imp+Fam:लो #;

कर+V+Imp+Pol:कीजिए #;
कर+V+Imp+Pol+Fut:कीजिएगा #;

दे+V+Imp+Pol:दीजिए #;
दे+V+Imp+Pol+Fut:दीजिएगा #;

ले+V+Imp+Pol:लीजिए #;
ले+V+Imp+Pol+Fut:लीजिएगा #;

पी+V+Imp+Pol:पीजिए #;
पी+V+Imp+Pol+Fut:पीजिएगा #;

दे+V+Sub:द Subjunctive;
ले+V+Sub:ल Subjunctive;

LEXICON Perfective
+Masc+Sg:^आ #;
+Masc+Pl:^ए #;
+Fem+Sg:^ई #;
+Fem+Pl:^ईं #;

LEXICON Subjunctive
+1p+Sg:^ऊँ #;
+1p+Pl:^एँ #;
+2p+Sg+Fam:^ए #;
+2p+Sg+Pol:^एँ #;
+2p+Pl+Fam:^ओ #;
+2p+Pl+Pol:^एँ #;
+3p+Sg:^ए #;
+3p+Pl:^एँ #;

LEXICON Hona
! Present
+Pres+1p+Sg:हूँ #;
+Pres+2p+Sg+Int:है #;
+Pres+3p+Sg:है #;
+Pres+1p+Pl:हैं #;
+Pres+2p+Fam:हो #;
+Pres+3p+Pl:हैं #;

! Past
+Past+Masc+Sg:था #;
+Past+Masc+Pl:थे #;
+Past+Fem+Sg:थी #;
+Past+Fem+Pl:थीं #;

! Future
+Fut+1p+Masc+Sg:हूँगा #;
+Fut+1p+Fem+Sg:हूँगी #;
+Fut+1p+Masc+Pl:होंगे #;
+Fut+1p+Fem+Pl:होंगीं #;

+Fut+2p+Masc+Sg:होगा #;
+Fut+2p+Fem+Sg:होगी #;
+Fut+2p+Masc+Pl:होगे #;
+Fut+2p+Fem+Pl:होगीं #;

+Fut+3p+Masc+Sg:होगा #;
+Fut+3p+Fem+Sg:होगी #;
+Fut+3p+Masc+Pl:होंगे #;
+Fut+3p+Fem+Pl:होंगीं #;

! Imperative
+Imp+Fam:हौ #;
+Imp+Fam:हूजियो #;
+Imp+Int:हूजिए #;
+Imp+Int:हो #;
+Imp+Pol+Fut:हूजिएगा #;

! Subjunctive
+Sub+1p+Sg:हूँ #;
+Sub+1p+Pl:हों #;
+Sub+1p+Pl:होवैं #;
+Sub+2p+Sg+Fam:हो #;
+Sub+2p+Sg+Fam:हौ #;
+Sub+2p+Sg+Pol:हों #;
+Sub+2p+Sg+Pol:होवैं #;
+Sub+2p+Pl+Fam:हो #;
+Sub+2p+Pl+Pol:हों #;
+Sub+2p+Pl+Pol:होवैं #;
+Sub+3p+Sg:हो #;
+Sub+3p+Pl:हों #;
+Sub+3p+Pl:होवैं #;
